test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-mainsted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - mainsted: # Verb 'to tell' - full paradigm
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mainstam
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mainstak
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mainast
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: mainstep
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mainsteʹped
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mainste
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+4: mainstet
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: maainâst

     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mainstem
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mainstiǩ
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mainsti
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: mainstim
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mainstid
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mainste
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+4: mainsteš
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: [mainstam, maainstam]

     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg1: mainsteʹžem
     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg2: mainsteʹžiǩ
     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg3: mainstež
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl1: mainsteʹžep
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl2: mainsteʹžid
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl3: mainsteʹže
     mainsted+V+Pot+4: [mainsteʹžet, maainsteʹžet]
     mainsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: [mainsteʹže, maainsteʹže]

     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg1: [mainsteʹčem, maainsteʹčem]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg2: [mainsteʹčiǩ, maainsteʹčiǩ]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg3: [mainsteʹči, maainsteʹči]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl1: [mainsteʹčim, maainsteʹčim, mainsteʹčep, maainsteʹčep]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl2: [mainsteʹčid, maainsteʹčid]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl3: [mainsteʹče, maainsteʹče]
     mainsted+V+Cond+4: [mainsteʹčeš, maainsteʹčeš]

     mainsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: [mainsteʹče, maainsteʹče]

     mainsted+V+Imprt+Sg2: maainâst
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Sg3: [mainstââǥǥas, maainstââǥǥas]
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl1: [mainstâkap, maainstâkap]
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl2: [mainsteʹǩed, maainsteʹǩed]
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl3: [mainstâkaz, maainstâkaz]
     mainsted+V+Imprt+2+ConNeg: maainâst
     mainsted+V+Imprt+13+ConNeg: [mainstuku, maainstuku]
     mainsted+V+ActEss: [mainsteʹmen, maainsteʹmen]
     mainsted+V+Action: [mainstam, maainstam]
     mainsted+V+PrsPrc: [mainsteei, maainsteei]
     mainsted+V+PrfPrc: [mainstam, maainstam]
     mainsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [mainstummu, maainstummu, mainstuum, maainstuum]
     mainsted+V+VAbess: [mainsteǩâni, maainsteǩâni]

     mainsted+V+GerTemp: [mainsteen, maainsteen]
     mainsted+V+GerInstr: [mainsteeʹl, maainsteeʹl]




#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [mainstam, maainstam]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [mainstak, maainstak]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maainast
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [mainstep, maainstep]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [mainsteʹped, maainsteʹped]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [mainste, maainste] 
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+4: [mainstet, maainstet]
#
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [mainstem, maainstem]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [mainstiǩ, maainstiǩ]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [mainsti, maainsti]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [mainstim, maainstim, mainstin, maainstin, mainstiim, maainstiim, mainstiin, maainstiin]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mainstid, maainstid, mainstiid, maainstiid]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mainste, maainste]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+4: [mainsteš, maainsteš]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg1: [mainsteʹžem, maainsteʹžem]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg2: [mainsteʹžiǩ, maainsteʹžiǩ]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg3: [mainstež, maainsteʹž]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl1: [mainsteʹžep, maainsteʹžep, mainsteʹžim, maainsteʹžim, mainsteʹžin, maainsteʹžin]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl2: [mainsteʹžid, maainsteʹžid]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl3: [mainsteʹže, maainsteʹže]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+4: [mainsteʹžet, maainsteʹžet]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: [mainsteʹže, maainsteʹže]
#
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg1: [mainsteʹčem, maainsteʹčem]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg2: [mainsteʹčiǩ, maainsteʹčiǩ]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg3: [mainsteʹči, maainsteʹči]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl1: [mainsteʹčim, maainsteʹčim, mainsteʹčep, maainsteʹčep]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl2: [mainsteʹčid, maainsteʹčid]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl3: [mainsteʹče, maainsteʹče]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+4: [mainsteʹčeš, maainsteʹčeš]
#
#     mainsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: [mainsteʹče, maainsteʹče]
#
#     mainsted+V+Imprt+Sg2: maainâst
#     mainsted+V+Imprt+Sg3: [mainstââǥǥas, maainstââǥǥas]
#     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl1: [mainstâkap, maainstâkap]
#     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl2: [mainsteʹǩed, maainsteʹǩed]
#     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl3: [mainstâkaz, maainstâkaz]
#     mainsted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: [mainstuku, maainstuku]
#     mainsted+V+ActEss: [mainsteʹmen, maainsteʹmen]
#     mainsted+V+Action: [mainstam, maainstam]
#     mainsted+V+PrsPrc: [mainsteei, maainsteei]
#     mainsted+V+PrfPrc: [mainstam, maainstam]
#     mainsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [mainstummu, maainstummu, mainstuum, maainstuum]
#     mainsted+V+VAbess: [mainsteǩâni, maainsteǩâni]
#
#     mainsted+V+GerTemp: [mainsteen, maainsteen]
#     mainsted+V+GerInstr: [mainsteeʹl, maainsteeʹl]
